Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.365

Firearm security and storage—Requirements for dealers.

(1) When selling or transferring any firearm, every dealer shall offer to sell or give the purchaser or transferee a secure gun storage device, or a trigger lock or similar device that is designed to prevent the unauthorized use or discharge of the firearm.

(2) Every store, shop, or sales outlet where firearms are sold, that is registered as a dealer in firearms with the department of licensing, shall conspicuously post, in a prominent location so that all patrons may take notice, the following warning sign, to be provided by the department of licensing, in block letters at least one inch in height:

WARNING: YOU MAY FACE CRIMINAL PROSECUTION IF YOU STORE OR LEAVE AN UNSECURED FIREARM WHERE A PERSON WHO IS PROHIBITED FROM POSSESSING FIREARMS CAN AND DOES OBTAIN POSSESSION.

(3) Every store, shop, or sales outlet where firearms are sold that is registered as a dealer in firearms with the department of licensing, upon the sale or transfer of a firearm, shall deliver a written warning to the purchaser or transferee that states, in block letters not less than one-fourth inch in height:

WARNING: YOU MAY FACE CRIMINAL PROSECUTION IF YOU STORE OR LEAVE AN UNSECURED FIREARM WHERE A PERSON WHO IS PROHIBITED FROM POSSESSING FIREARMS CAN AND DOES OBTAIN POSSESSION.

(4) Every person who violates this section is guilty of a class 1 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and may be fined up to two hundred fifty dollars. However, no such fines may be levied until thirty days have expired from the time warning signs required under subsection (2) of this section are distributed by the department of licensing.

[ 2019 c 3 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 1639, approved November 6, 2018).]

NOTES:

Finding—Short title—Effective dates—Implementation—2019 c 3 (Initiative Measure No. 1639): See notes following RCW 9.41.360.